Massachusetts, session 194th, S2234.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The first paragraph of section 110 of chapter 239 of the Acts of 2024 is hereby amended
by striking the paragraph and inserting the following:-
The initial regulations required to be promulgated by the executive office of energy and
environmental affairs or its designated agency under section 31 of chapter 21A of the General
Laws and the initial regulations required to be promulgated by the division of standards in the
office of consumer affairs and business regulation under section 59 of chapter 98 of the General
Laws shall be completed not later than February 1, 2026 and shall apply to chargers installed on
or after March 30, 2023.
of 1